Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.10.040

Higher educational institutions to be nonsectarian.

All institutions of higher education supported wholly or in part by state funds, and by whatsoever name so designated, shall be forever free from religious or sectarian control or influence.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.10.040. Prior: (i) 1909 c 97 p 242 s 7; RRS s 4559; prior: 1897 c 118 s 188; 1890 p 396 s 5. Formerly RCW 28.77.013; 28.76.040, part. (ii) 1909 c 97 p 243 s 1, part; RRS s 4568, part; prior: 1897 c 118 s 190, part; 1891 c 145 s 1, part. Formerly RCW 28.80.015, part; 28.76.040, part.]

NOTES:

Nonsectarian: State Constitution Art. 9 s 4, Art. 26.